Hawaii, session 2026, SB2895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-303, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  Every application for an identification card or duplicate of an identification card shall be made on a form developed by the director and furnished by the examiner of drivers, signed by the applicant, and signed by the applicant's parent or guardian if the applicant is under [eighteen] sixteen years of age[.]; provided that nothing in this subsection shall affect the minimum age required under section 286-104 to be issued a driver's license.  The application shall contain the following information: (1)  Name and complete address, including the number and street name, of the applicant's permanent residence; (2)  The applicant's occupation and any pertinent data relating thereto; (3)  The applicant's citizenship status; (4)  The applicant's veteran status if applicable and desired by the applicant; (5)  The applicant's date and place of birth; (6)  General description of the applicant, including the applicant's gender designation, height, weight, hair color, and eye color; (7)  The applicant's left and right index fingerprints or, if clear impressions cannot be obtained, other identifying imprints as specified by rules of the director; (8)  The social security number of the applicant; and (9)  A digitized frontal photograph of the applicant's full face. Each applicant shall present documentary evidence as required by the examiner of drivers of the applicant's age and identity, and the applicant shall swear or affirm that all information given is true and correct; provided that an applicant shall not be required to provide documentation to prove the applicant's gender designation other than the applicant's self-certification of their chosen gender designation; provided further that documentation that may incidentally show an applicant's birth gender may be required if necessary to establish that the applicant is legally entitled to an identification card. For purposes of this subsection, "gender designation" shall have the same meaning as in section 286-109(a)." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________